Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1017
Board; officers; election.

The board of directors shall annually elect a chairman, vice-chairman, secretary and treasurer for a term of one year and until a successor is elected and qualified.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 17, p. 755.